Utah statutes.
63M-8-202.   Members -- Appointment -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Expenses.
(1) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (1)(b), the commission shall consist
of up to 15 members to be appointed by the governor for a four-year term.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (1)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of commission members are staggered so that
approximately half of the commission is appointed every two years.
(c)  Members may serve two consecutive appointments.
(d)  In making appointments, the governor shall insure that no more than one
more than half the membership is from the same political party.
(2)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(3)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
